Massachusetts, session 194th, S637.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Pursuant to 310 CMR 15.000, the department shall not require a dwelling
used as a primary residence to install or upgrade to Best Available Nitrogen Reducing
Technology, unless said installation or upgrade is required by an enforceable Watershed Permit
issued pursuant to 314 CMR 21.00. No Watershed Permit shall be required or enforced unless
the department or the general court, by appropriation, provides for any cost obligations imposed
upon the Local Government Unit, including any costs incurred to a primary residence.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1